tests/автан.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах автан":
    автан<n><nom> :  автан 
    автан<n><gen> :  автанӑн 
    автан<n><dat> :  автана 
    автан<n><loc> :  автанта
    автан<n><abl> :  автантан
    автан<n><ins> :  автанпа 
    автан<n><abe> :  автансӑр 
    автан<n><ben> :  автаншӑн
    автан<n><px1sg><nom> :  автанӑм 
    автан<n><px1sg><gen> :  автанӑмӑн 
    автан<n><px1sg><dat> :  автанӑма 
    автан<n><px1sg><loc> :  автанӑмра 
    автан<n><px1sg><abl> :  автанӑмран 
    автан<n><px1sg><ins> :  автанӑмпа 
    автан<n><px1sg><abe> :  автанӑмсӑр 
    автан<n><px1sg><ben> :  автанӑмшӑн
    автан<n><px2sg><nom> :  автану 
    автан<n><px2sg><gen> :  автанун 
    автан<n><px2sg><dat> :  автанна
    автан<n><px2sg><loc> :  автанунта 
    автан<n><px2sg><abl> :  автанунтан 
    автан<n><px2sg><ins> :  автанупа 
    автан<n><px2sg><abe> :  автанусӑр 
    автан<n><px2sg><ben> :  автанушӑн
    автан<n><px3sp><nom> :  автанӗ 
    автан<n><px3sp><gen> :  автанӗн 
    автан<n><px3sp><dat> :  автанне 
    автан<n><px3sp><loc> :  автанӗнче 
    автан<n><px3sp><abl> :  автанӗнчен 
    автан<n><px3sp><ins> :  автанӗпе 
    автан<n><px3sp><abe> :  автанӗсӗр 
    автан<n><px3sp><ben> :  автанӗшӗн
    автан<n><px1pl><nom> :  автанӑмӑр 
    автан<n><px1pl><gen> :  автанӑмӑрӑн 
    автан<n><px1pl><dat> :  автанӑмӑра 
    автан<n><px1pl><loc> :  автанӑмӑрта 
    автан<n><px1pl><abl> :  автанӑмӑртан 
    автан<n><px1pl><ins> :  автанӑмӑрпа 
    автан<n><px1pl><abe> :  автанӑмӑрсӑр 
    автан<n><px1pl><ben> :  автанӑмӑршӑн
    автан<n><px2pl><nom> :  автанӑр 
    автан<n><px2pl><gen> :  автанӑрӑн 
    автан<n><px2pl><dat> :  автанӑра 
    автан<n><px2pl><loc> :  автанӑрта 
    автан<n><px2pl><abl> :  автанӑртан 
    автан<n><px2pl><ins> :  автанӑрпа 
    автан<n><px2pl><abe> :  автанӑрсӑр 
    автан<n><px2pl><ben> :  автанӑршӑн
    автан<n><pl><nom> :  автансем 
    автан<n><pl><gen> :  автансен 
    автан<n><pl><dat> :  автансене 
    автан<n><pl><loc> :  автансенче 
    автан<n><pl><abl> :  автансенчен 
    автан<n><pl><ins> :  автансемпе 
    автан<n><pl><abe> :  автансемсӗр 
    автан<n><pl><ben> :  автансемшӗн
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  автанӑмсем 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  автанӑмсен 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  автанӑмсене 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  автанӑмсенче 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  автанӑмсенчен 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  автанӑмсемпе 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  автанӑмсемсӗр 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  автанӑмсемшӗн
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  автанусем 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  автанусен 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  автанусене 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  автанусенче 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  автанусенчен 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  автанусемпе 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  автанусемсӗр 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  автанусемшӗн
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  автанӗсем 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  автанӗсен 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  автанӗсене 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  автанӗсенче 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  автанӗсенчен 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  автанӗсемпе 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  автанӗсемсӗр 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  автанӗсемшӗн
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  автанӑмӑрсем 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  автанӑмӑрсен 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  автанӑмӑрсене 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  автанӑмӑрсенче 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  автанӑмӑрсенчен 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  автанӑмӑрсемпе 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  автанӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  автанӑмӑрсемшӗн
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  автанӑрсем 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  автанӑрсен 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  автанӑрсене 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  автанӑрсенче 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  автанӑрсенчен 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  автанӑрсемпе 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  автанӑрсемсӗр 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  автанӑрсемшӗн
